Hawaii statutes.
§460J-3 Powers and duties of board. In
addition to any other powers and duties authorized by law, the board shall:

(1) Grant licenses to operators pursuant to this
chapter;

(2) Adopt, amend, or repeal rules as it may deem
necessary to effectuate this chapter and carry out the purpose thereof which
purpose is the protection of the general public. All rules shall be adopted
pursuant to chapter 91. The rules shall:

(A) Forbid acts or practices deemed by the
board to be detrimental to the accomplishment of the purpose of this chapter;

(B) Require operators to make reports to the
board containing items of information that will enable the board to improve the
enforcement of this chapter and its rules to fully effectuate the purposes of
this chapter;

(C) Require operators to furnish reports to
owners containing matters of information as the board deems necessary to
promote the purpose of this chapter;

(D) Require liability and workers'
compensation insurance verification for license renewals; and

(E) Provide for the development of an
enforcement information reporting system;

(3) Enforce this chapter and rules adopted pursuant
thereto;

(4) Suspend or revoke any license for any cause
prescribed by this chapter, or for any violation of the rules, and refuse to
grant any license for any cause that would be grounds for revocation or
suspension of a license; and

(5) Direct the executive secretary to publish and
distribute pamphlets and circulars containing information as it deems proper to
further the accomplishment of the purpose of this chapter. [L 1972, c 134, pt
of §1; am L 1986, c 126, §2; am L 1992, c 202, §130; am L 2004, c 175, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next